Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-829.31
Adjutant General; Emergency Management Act; administer.

There is hereby created in the office of the Adjutant General the Nebraska Emergency Management Agency. The Adjutant General shall administer the Emergency Management Act.

Laws 1953, c. 336, § 2, p. 1106;

Laws 1996, LB 43, § 16.

Emergency Management Act, see section 81-829.36.

For provisions relating to the Adjutant General, see section 55-101 et seq.

Vital resource emergency, see sections 84-162 to 84-167.